Alaska statutes. Title 22. Judiciary.
Article 1. Judicial Officers.

Sec. 22.20.010.
Judicial officer defined.

The term “judicial officer” means a supreme court justice, including the chief justice, a judge of the court of appeals, a judge of the superior court, a district judge, and a magistrate.

History.

(§ 54-2-1 ACLA 1949; am § 16 ch 12 SLA 1980)

Sec. 22.20.020.
Disqualification of judicial officer for cause.

A judicial officer may not act in a matter in which

the judicial officer is a party;

the judicial officer is related to a party or a party’s attorney by consanguinity or affinity within the third degree;

the judicial officer is a material witness;

the judicial officer or the spouse of the judicial officer, individually or as a fiduciary, or a child of the judicial officer has a direct financial interest in the matter;

a party, except the state or a municipality of the state, has retained or been professionally counseled by the judicial officer as its attorney within two years preceding the assignment of the judicial officer to the matter;

the judicial officer has represented a person as attorney for the person against a party, except the state or a municipality of the state, in a matter within two years preceding the assignment of the judicial officer to the matter;

an attorney for a party has represented the judicial officer or a person against the judicial officer, either in the judicial officer’s public or private capacity, in a matter within two years preceding the filing of the action;

the law firm with which the judicial officer was associated in the practice of law within the two years preceding the filing of the action has been retained or has professionally counseled either party with respect to the matter;

the judicial officer feels that, for any reason, a fair and impartial decision cannot be given.

A judicial officer shall disclose, on the record, a reason for disqualification specified in (a) of this section at the commencement of a matter in which the judicial officer participates. The disqualifications specified in (a)(2), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), and (a)(8) of this section may be waived by the parties and are waived unless a party raises an objection.

If a judicial officer is disqualified on the officer’s own motion or consents to disqualification, the presiding judge of the district shall immediately transfer the action to another judge of that district to which the objections of the parties do not apply or are least applicable and if there is no such judge, the chief justice of the supreme court shall assign a judge for the hearing or trial of the action. If a judicial officer denies disqualification the question shall be heard and determined by another judge assigned for the purpose by the presiding judge of the next higher level of courts or, if none, by the other members of the supreme court. The hearing may be ex parte and without notice to the parties or judge.

History.

(§ 54-2-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1967; am §§ 10, 11 ch 38 SLA 1987; am § 38 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For other statutory provisions concerning disqualification of judges, see AS

22.30.070(a)

.
For when a judge should disqualify himself or herself, see Canon 3C of the Code of Judicial Conduct.

Sec. 22.20.022.
Peremptory disqualification of a judge.

If a party or a party’s attorney in a district court action or a superior court action, civil or criminal, files an affidavit alleging under oath the belief that a fair and impartial trial cannot be obtained, the presiding district court or superior court judge, respectively, shall at once, and without requiring proof, assign the action to another judge of the appropriate court in that district, or if there is none, the chief justice of the supreme court shall assign a judge for the hearing or trial of the action. The affidavit must contain a statement that it is made in good faith and not for the purpose of delay.

A judge or court may not punish a person for contempt for making, filing, or presenting the affidavit provided for in this section, or a motion founded on the affidavit.

The affidavit shall be filed within five days after the case is at issue upon a question of fact, or within five days after the issue is assigned to a judge, whichever event occurs later, unless good cause is shown for the failure to file it within that time.

A party or a party’s attorney may not file more than one affidavit under this section in an action and no more than two affidavits in an action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 48 SLA 1967; am § 6 ch 143 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 116 SLA 1971)

Cross references. —

For court rules on change of judge as a matter of right, see Rule 42(c), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure and Rule 25(d), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. In this regard Rule 42(c) and Rule 25(d) both provide that a notice of change of judge “shall neither specify grounds nor be accompanied by an affidavit.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 1(c), ch. 18, SLA 1991 states that it “was not the intent of the legislature in enacting AS

22.20.022

to allow the disqualification of a judge, if the judge has no financial interest in the outcome of the case other than that of a taxpayer or a permanent fund dividend recipient.”

Sec. 22.20.030.
Power of judicial officers.

A judicial officer may

preserve and enforce order in the immediate presence of the court and in the proceedings before the court, when engaged in the performance of a duty imposed by law on the judicial officer;

compel obedience to the lawful orders of the court, as provided by law;

compel the attendance of persons to testify in a pending proceeding in the cases and manner provided by law;

administer oaths in a proceeding pending before the court and in all other cases where it may be necessary in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties of the judicial officer;

take and certify the proof and acknowledgment of a conveyance of real property, or any other written instrument authorized or required to be proved or acknowledged;

take and certify the acknowledgment of satisfaction of a judgment in any court;

take and certify an affidavit or deposition to be used in any court of justice or other tribunal of the state.

History.

(§§ 54-2-3, 54-2-5, 54-2-6 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 22.20.035.
Powers of judicial employees.

The clerk of a court, and a deputy clerk designated by order of a court, may exercise the powers of judicial officers specified in AS

22.20.030

(4)-(7), and other powers authorized by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1967)

Sec. 22.20.037.
Employment of judicial employees.

Judicial employees shall be employed subject to classification and wage plans based on the merit principle and adapted to the special needs of the judiciary, as determined by the administrative director of the Alaska Court System. Except as otherwise provided by law, all employees of the Alaska Court System and the judicial council are subject to the general state laws regarding leave, retirement, and travel.

This section does not deprive employees of the judiciary of the right to participate in the state employees retirement system, a group insurance plan, or any other program, benefits, or rights provided by law or personnel rule for state employees in the classified service.

The administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall conduct a salary survey annually to ensure that employees of the Alaska Court System receive salaries consistent with those paid to employees in the classified and partially exempt state service.

The administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall file a travel and compensation report with the legislature by January 31 of each year. The report must contain detailed information for the previous calendar year of the salaries, per diem, travel expenses, relocation expenses, and any additional allowances for

each justice of the supreme court;

each judge of the court of appeals; and

the administrative director of the Alaska Court System.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1999; am §§ 25 — 27 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “the Alaska Court System” for “courts” in the first sentence in (a) and near the beginning of (c), substituted “Alaska Court System” for “court system” near the beginning and at the end of (d), and made a stylistic change.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Application to judicial and permanent legislative employees of the general laws of the state covering leave, including the Department of Administration’s regulation on terminal leave, does not infringe upon the power of the judicial and legislative branches to supervise, hire, or discharge personnel, or the power to determine employee salaries. April 9, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.